Utah statutes.
70A-2a-215.   Cumulation and conflict of warranties express or implied.
Warranties, whether express or implied, must be construed as consistent with
each other and as cumulative, but if that construction is unreasonable, the
intention of the parties determines which warranty is dominant.  In
ascertaining that intention the following rules apply:
(1)  Exact or technical specifications displace an inconsistent sample or
model or general language of description.
(2)  A sample from an existing bulk displaces inconsistent general language of
description.
(3)  Express warranties displace inconsistent implied warranties other than an
implied warranty of fitness for a particular purpose.
